New York, session 2025-2026, A2200.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 20-a of section 3 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is renumbered subdivision 20-h and a new subdivision 20-a is 3 added to read as follows: 4 20-a. "Membership warehouse retailer" means and includes any store 5 primarily engaged in the retail sale of a general line of groceries, 6 which may include apparel, furniture and appliances which limits access 7 to members of the club including businesses and individuals who are 8 subject to pay a fee or premium to shop in the club. 9 § 2. Section 100 of the alcoholic beverage control law is amended by 10 adding a new subdivision 2-c to read as follows: 11 2-c. (a) No membership warehouse retailer shall sell, or knowingly 12 agree to sell, or sell by omission, any alcoholic beverage to a retailer 13 who presents a corporate or business, debit, credit, or membership card 14 bearing the name of a retailer at the point of sale. The first violation 15 of this subdivision shall result in a written notice of violation and 16 warning from the liquor authority. A second violation of this subdivi- 17 sion shall result in a suspension and imposition of a civil penalty 18 pursuant to section one hundred eighteen of this article. A third 19 violation of this subdivision shall result in a revocation, or cancella- 20 tion of a license to sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to section one 21 hundred eighteen of this article. 22 (b) The acceptance by a membership warehouse retailer of a corporate 23 or business, debit, credit, or membership card that has sufficient indi- 24 cia of an association with a retailer is a willful intent to violate the 25 law within this subdivision. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04952-01-5